test/src/old-gt-norm-yamls/N-AN-okimaw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - okimâw - ok : # -m animate noun, chief, poss.paradigm Okimasis p 135

     okimâw+N+AN+Sg: okimâw
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl: okimâwak
     okimâw+N+AN+Loc: okimânâhk 
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Obv: okimâwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [okimâsis, okimâs]
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [okimâsisak, okimâsak]
     
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitôkimâm
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitôkimâm
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otôkimâma
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otôkimâmiyiwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitôkimâminân
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitôkimâminaw
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitôkimâmiwâw
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otôkimâmiwâwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otôkimâmiyiwa
     
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitôkimâmak
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitôkimâmak
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otôkimâma
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otôkimâmiyiwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitôkimâminânak
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitôkimâminawak
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitôkimâmiwâwak
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otôkimâmiwâwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otôkimâmiyiwa
     
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicôkimâmis
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicôkimâmis
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: ocôkimâmisa
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: ocôkimâmisiyiwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nicôkimâmisinân
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kicôkimâmisinaw
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicôkimâmisiwâw
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: ocôkimâmisiwâwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: ocôkimâmisiyiwa
     
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nicôkimâmisak
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kicôkimâmisak
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: ocôkimâmisa
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: ocôkimâmisiyiwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nicôkimâmisinânak
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kicôkimâmisinawak
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kicôkimâmisiwâwak
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: ocôkimâmisiwâwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: ocôkimâmisiyiwa
     
